Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2245
Cleanup testing, defined.

Cleanup testing shall mean testing done in an affected swine herd as part of a swine herd cleanup plan.

Laws 1990, LB 1004, § 8;

R.S.Supp.,1990, § 54-2208.03;

Laws 1991, LB 359, § 10.